Virginia statutes. Title 20. Domestic Relations.
Chapter 6. Divorce, Affirmation and Annulment.
§ 20-108.2. Guideline for determination of child support; quadrennial review by Child Support Guidelines Review Panel; executive summary.

There shall be a rebuttable presumption in any judicial or administrative proceeding for child support under this title or Title 16.1 or 63.2, including cases involving split custody, shared custody, or multiple custody arrangements pursuant to subdivisions G 4, 5, and 6, that the amount of the award which would result from the application of the guidelines set forth in this section is the correct amount of child support to be awarded. In order to rebut the presumption, the court shall make written findings in the order as set out in § 20-108.1, which findings may be incorporated by reference, that the application of the guidelines would be unjust or inappropriate in a particular case as determined by relevant evidence pertaining to the factors set out in § 20-108.1. The Department of Social Services shall set child support at the amount resulting from computations using the guidelines set out in this section pursuant to the authority granted to it in Chapter 19 (§ 63.2-1900 et seq.) of Title 63.2 and subject to the provisions of § 63.2-1918.

For purposes of application of the guideline, a basic child support obligation shall be computed using the schedule set out below. For combined monthly gross income amounts falling between amounts shown in the schedule, basic child support obligation amounts shall be extrapolated. However, unless one of the following exemptions applies where the sole custody child support obligation as computed pursuant to subdivision G 1 is less than the statutory minimum per month, there shall be a presumptive minimum child support obligation of the statutory minimum per month payable by the payor parent. If the gross income of the obligor is equal to or less than 150 percent of the federal poverty level promulgated by the U.S. Department of Health and Human Services from time to time, then the court, upon hearing evidence that there is no ability to pay the presumptive statutory minimum, may set an obligation below the presumptive statutory minimum provided doing so does not create or reduce a support obligation to an amount which seriously impairs the custodial parent's ability to maintain minimal adequate housing and provide other basic necessities for the child. Exemptions from this presumptive minimum monthly child support obligation shall include: parents unable to pay child support because they lack sufficient assets from which to pay child support and who, in addition, are institutionalized in a psychiatric facility; are imprisoned for life with no chance of parole; are medically verified to be totally and permanently disabled with no evidence of potential for paying child support, including recipients of Supplemental Security Income (SSI); or are otherwise involuntarily unable to produce income. "Number of children" means the number of children for whom the parents share joint legal responsibility and for whom support is being sought. The guidelines worksheet relied upon by the court or the Department of Social Services to compute a child support obligation for a support order issued by such court or the Department shall be placed in the court's file or the Department's file, and a copy of such guidelines worksheet shall be provided to the parties.

For purposes of this section, "gross income" means all income from all sources, and shall include, but not be limited to, income from salaries, wages, commissions, royalties, bonuses, dividends, severance pay, pensions, interest, trust income, annuities, capital gains, social security benefits except as listed below, workers' compensation benefits, unemployment insurance benefits, disability insurance benefits, veterans' benefits, spousal support, rental income, gifts, prizes or awards.

Benefits from public assistance and social services programs as defined in § 63.2-100;

Federal supplemental security income benefits;

Child support received; or

Income received by the payor from secondary employment income not previously included in "gross income," where the payor obtained the income to discharge a child support arrearage established by a court or administrative order and the payor is paying the arrearage pursuant to the order. "Secondary employment income" includes but is not limited to income from an additional job, from self-employment, or from overtime employment. The cessation of such secondary income upon the payment of the arrearage shall not be the basis for a material change in circumstances upon which a modification of child support may be based.

Except for good cause shown or the agreement of the parties, in addition to any other child support obligations established pursuant to this section, any child support order shall provide that the parents pay in proportion to their gross incomes, as used for calculating the monthly support obligation, any reasonable and necessary unreimbursed medical or dental expenses. The method of payment of those expenses shall be contained in the support order. Each parent shall pay his respective share of expenses as those expenses are incurred. Any amount paid under this subsection shall not be adjusted by, nor added to, the child support calculated in accordance with subsection G. For the purposes of this section, medical or dental expenses shall include but not be limited to eyeglasses, prescription medication, prosthetics, orthodontics, and mental health or developmental disabilities services, including but not limited to services provided by a social worker, psychologist, psychiatrist, counselor, or therapist.

The costs for health care coverage as defined in § 63.2-1900, vision care coverage, and dental care coverage for the child or children who are the subject of the child support order that are being paid by a parent or that parent's spouse shall be added to the basic child support obligation. To determine the cost to be added to the basic child support obligation, the cost per person shall be applied to the child or children who are subject of the child support order. If the per child cost is provided by the insurer, that is the cost per person. Otherwise, to determine the cost per person, the cost of individual coverage for the policy holder shall be subtracted from the total cost of the coverage, and the remaining amount shall be divided by the number of remaining covered persons.

Any child-care costs incurred on behalf of the child or children due to employment of the custodial parent shall be added to the basic child support obligation. Child-care costs shall not exceed the amount required to provide quality care from a licensed source. When requested by the noncustodial parent, the court may require the custodial parent to present documentation to verify the costs incurred for child care under this subsection. Where appropriate, the court shall consider the willingness and availability of the noncustodial parent to provide child care personally in determining whether child-care costs are necessary or excessive. Upon the request of either party, and upon a showing of the tax savings a party derives from child-care cost deductions or credits, the court shall factor actual tax consequences into its calculation of the child-care costs to be added to the basic child support obligation.

Sole custody support. The sole custody total monthly child support obligation shall be established by adding (i) the monthly basic child support obligation, as determined from the schedule contained in subsection B, (ii) costs for health care coverage to the extent allowable by subsection E, and (iii) work-related child-care costs and taking into consideration all the factors set forth in subsection B of § 20-108.1. The total monthly child support obligation shall be divided between the parents in the same proportion as their monthly gross incomes bear to their monthly combined gross income. The monthly obligation of each parent shall be computed by multiplying each parent's percentage of the parents' monthly combined gross income by the total monthly child support obligation.
G. 1.
Sole custody support. The sole custody total monthly child support obligation shall be established by adding (i) the monthly basic child support obligation, as determined from the schedule contained in subsection B, (ii) costs for health care coverage to the extent allowable by subsection E, and (iii) work-related child-care costs and taking into consideration all the factors set forth in subsection B of § 20-108.1. The total monthly child support obligation shall be divided between the parents in the same proportion as their monthly gross incomes bear to their monthly combined gross income. The monthly obligation of each parent shall be computed by multiplying each parent's percentage of the parents' monthly combined gross income by the total monthly child support obligation.

Split custody support. In cases involving split custody, the amount of child support to be paid shall be the difference between the amounts owed by each parent as a noncustodial parent, computed in accordance with subdivision 1, with the noncustodial parent owing the larger amount paying the difference to the other parent. Unreimbursed medical and dental expenses shall be calculated and allocated in accordance with subsection D.

Shared custody support.

Where a party has custody or visitation of a child or children for more than 90 days of the year, as such days are defined in subdivision G 3 (c), a shared custody child support amount based on the ratio in which the parents share the custody and visitation of any child or children shall be calculated in accordance with this subdivision. The presumptive support to be paid shall be the shared custody support amount, unless a party affirmatively shows that the sole custody support amount calculated as provided in subdivision G 1 is less than the shared custody support amount. If so, the lesser amount shall be the support to be paid. For the purposes of this subsection, the following shall apply:

Income share. "Income share" means a parent's percentage of the combined monthly gross income of both parents. The income share of a parent is that parent's gross income divided by the combined gross incomes of the parties.

Custody share. "Custody share" means the number of days that a parent has physical custody, whether by sole custody, joint legal or joint residential custody, or visitation, of a shared child per year divided by the number of days in the year. The actual or anticipated "custody share" of the parent who has or will have fewer days of physical custody shall be calculated for a one-year period. The "custody share" of the other parent shall be presumed to be the number of days in the year less the number of days calculated as the first parent's "custody share." For purposes of this calculation, the year may begin on such date as is determined in the discretion of the court, and the day may begin at such time as is determined in the discretion of the court. For purposes of this calculation, a day shall be as defined in subdivision G 3 (c).

Shared support need. "Shared support need" means the presumptive guideline amount of needed support for the shared child or children calculated pursuant to subsection B of this section, for the combined gross income of the parties and the number of shared children, multiplied by 1.4.

Sole custody support. "Sole custody support" means the support amount determined in accordance with subdivision G 1.

Support to be paid. The shared support need of the shared child or children shall be calculated pursuant to subdivision G 3 (a) (iii). This amount shall then be multiplied by the other parent's custody share. To that sum for each parent shall be added the other parent's or that parent's spouse's cost of health care coverage to the extent allowable by subsection E, plus the other parent's work-related child-care costs to the extent allowable by subsection F. This total for each parent shall be multiplied by that parent's income share. The support amounts thereby calculated that each parent owes the other shall be subtracted one from the other and the difference shall be the shared custody support one parent owes to the other, with the payor parent being the one whose shared support is the larger. Unreimbursed medical and dental expenses shall be calculated and allocated in accordance with subsection D.

Definition of a day. For the purposes of this section, "day" means a period of 24 hours; however, where the parent who has the fewer number of overnight periods during the year has an overnight period with a child, but has physical custody of the shared child for less than 24 hours during such overnight period, there is a presumption that each parent shall be allocated one-half of a day of custody for that period.

Minimum standards. Any calculation under this subdivision shall not create or reduce a support obligation to an amount which seriously impairs the custodial parent's ability to maintain minimal adequate housing and provide other basic necessities for the child. If the gross income of either party is equal to or less than 150 percent of the federal poverty level promulgated by the U.S. Department of Health and Human Services from time to time, then the shared custody support calculated pursuant to this subsection shall not be the presumptively correct support and the court may consider whether the sole custody support or the shared custody support is more just and appropriate.

Support modification. When there has been an award of child support based on the shared custody formula and one parent consistently fails to exercise custody or visitation in accordance with the parent's custody share upon which the award was based, there shall be a rebuttable presumption that the support award should be modified.

In the event that the shared custody support calculation indicates that the net support is to be paid to the parent who would not be the parent receiving support pursuant to the sole custody calculation, then the shared support shall be deemed to be the lesser support.

Calculating the per child monthly basic child support obligation by determining, for the number of children of the parties, the scheduled monthly basic child support obligation and dividing that amount by the number of children of the parties;

Calculating the sole custody pro rata monthly basic child support obligation by multiplying the per child monthly basic child support obligation determined in subdivision G 5 (a) (i) by the number of children subject to the sole custody support obligation; and

Applying the sole custody pro rata monthly basic child support obligation determined in subdivision G 5 (a) (ii) to the procedures in subdivision G 1.

Calculating the per child monthly basic child support obligation by determining, for the number of children of the parties, the scheduled monthly basic child support obligation and dividing that amount by the number of children of the parties;

Calculating the shared custody pro rata monthly basic child support obligation by multiplying the per child monthly basic child support obligation determined in subdivision G 5 (b) (i) by the number of children subject to the shared custody support obligation; and

Applying the shared custody pro rata monthly basic child support obligation determined in subdivision G 5 (b) (ii) to the procedures in subdivision G 3.

Calculating the per child monthly basic child custody support obligation by determining, for the number of children of the parties, the scheduled monthly basic child support obligation and dividing that amount by the number of children of the parties;

Calculating the split custody pro rata monthly basic child support obligation by multiplying the per child monthly basic child support obligation determined in subdivision G 6 (a) (i) by the number of children subject to the split custody support obligation; and

Applying the split custody pro rata monthly basic child support obligation determined in subdivision G 6 (a) (ii) for each parent to the procedures in subdivision G 2.

Calculating the per child monthly basic child custody support obligation by determining, for the number of children of the parties, the scheduled monthly basic child support obligation and dividing that amount by the number of children of the parties;

Calculating the shared custody pro rata monthly basic child custody support obligation by multiplying the per child monthly basic child support obligation determined in subdivision G 6 (b) (i) by the number of children subject to the shared custody support obligation; and

Applying the shared custody pro rata monthly basic child support obligation determined in subdivision G 6 (b) (ii) to the procedures in subdivision G 3.

The Secretary of Health and Human Resources shall ensure that the guideline set out in this section is reviewed by October 31, 2001, and every four years thereafter, by the Child Support Guidelines Review Panel, consisting of 15 members comprised of four legislative members and 11 nonlegislative citizen members. Members shall be appointed as follows: three members of the House Committee for Courts of Justice, upon the recommendation of the chairman of such committee, to be appointed by the Speaker of the House of Delegates in accordance with the principles of proportional representation contained in the Rules of the House of Delegates; one member of the Senate Committee on the Judiciary, upon the recommendation of the chairman of such committee, to be appointed by the Senate Committee on Rules; and one representative of a juvenile and domestic relations district court, one representative of a circuit court, one representative of the Department of Social Services' Division of Child Support Enforcement, three members of the Virginia State Bar, two custodial parents, two noncustodial parents, and one child advocate, upon the recommendation of the Secretary of Health and Human Resources, to be appointed by the Governor. The Panel shall determine the adequacy of the guideline for the determination of appropriate awards for the support of children by considering current research and data on the cost of and expenditures necessary for rearing children, and any other resources it deems relevant to such review. The Panel shall report its findings to the General Assembly as provided in the procedures of the Division of Legislative Automated Systems for the processing of legislative documents and reports before the General Assembly next convenes following such review.

SCHEDULE OF MONTHLY BASIC CHILD SUPPORT OBLIGATIONS

COMBINED
MONTHLY
GROSS
ONE
TWO
THREE
FOUR
FIVE
SIX
INCOME
CHILD
CHILDREN
CHILDREN
CHILDREN
CHILDREN
CHILDREN
0-350
68
104
126
141
155
169
400
78
119
144
161
177
192
450
88
133
162
181
199
216
500
97
148
179
200
220
239
550
107
162
197
220
242
263
600
116
177
215
240
264
287
650
126
191
232
259
285
310
700
135
206
250
279
307
333
750
145
220
267
298
328
357
800
154
234
284
317
349
379
850
163
248
300
336
369
401
900
171
260
316
353
388
422
950
179
273
331
369
406
442
1000
187
285
346
386
425
462
1050
196
298
361
403
443
482
1100
204
310
375
419
461
501
1150
212
323
390
436
480
521
1200
220
335
405
453
498
541
1250
228
347
420
469
516
561
1300
237
360
435
486
535
581
1350
245
372
450
503
553
601
1400
253
385
465
519
571
621
1450
261
397
480
536
589
641
1500
269
410
495
552
608
661
1550
278
422
509
569
626
680
1600
286
434
524
585
644
700
1650
293
446
538
601
661
718
1700
301
457
552
616
678
737
1750
309
469
566
632
695
756
1800
316
481
579
647
712
774
1850
324
492
593
663
729
792
1900
331
504
607
678
746
811
1950
339
515
621
693
763
829
2000
347
527
635
709
780
848
2050
354
538
648
724
797
866
2100
362
550
662
740
814
884
2150
369
561
676
755
830
903
2200
377
573
690
770
847
921
2250
385
584
703
786
864
940
2300
392
596
717
801
881
958
2350
400
607
731
817
898
976
2400
407
619
745
832
915
995
2450
415
630
759
847
932
1013
2500
423
642
772
863
949
1032
2550
430
653
786
878
966
1050
2600
438
665
800
894
983
1068
2650
445
676
814
909
1000
1087
2700
453
688
828
924
1017
1105
2750
460
699
841
940
1034
1124
2800
468
711
855
955
1051
1142
2850
476
722
869
971
1068
1160
2900
483
734
883
986
1084
1179
2950
491
745
896
1001
1101
1197
3000
498
757
910
1017
1118
1216
3050
506
768
924
1032
1135
1234
3100
514
780
938
1047
1152
1252
3150
521
791
952
1063
1169
1271
3200
529
803
965
1078
1186
1289
3250
536
814
979
1094
1203
1308
3300
544
826
993
1109
1220
1326
3350
551
837
1006
1123
1236
1343
3400
559
848
1019
1138
1252
1361
3450
566
859
1032
1152
1268
1378
3500
574
870
1045
1167
1283
1395
3550
581
881
1057
1181
1299
1412
3600
588
892
1070
1196
1315
1430
3650
596
903
1083
1210
1331
1447
3700
603
914
1096
1224
1347
1464
3750
611
925
1109
1239
1363
1481
3800
618
936
1122
1253
1379
1499
3850
626
947
1135
1268
1395
1516
3900
632
956
1146
1280
1408
1531
3950
638
966
1157
1293
1422
1546
4000
645
975
1168
1305
1436
1561
4050
651
985
1180
1318
1449
1575
4100
658
994
1191
1330
1463
1590
4150
664
1004
1202
1342
1477
1605
4200
670
1013
1213
1355
1490
1620
4250
677
1023
1224
1367
1504
1635
4300
682
1030
1233
1377
1515
1647
4350
687
1038
1242
1387
1526
1658
4400
693
1046
1251
1397
1537
1670
4450
698
1054
1260
1407
1548
1682
4500
704
1062
1268
1417
1559
1694
4550
709
1069
1277
1427
1569
1706
4600
714
1077
1286
1437
1580
1718
4650
720
1085
1295
1447
1591
1730
4700
725
1093
1304
1457
1602
1742
4750
731
1100
1313
1466
1613
1753
4800
736
1108
1322
1476
1624
1765
4850
741
1116
1331
1486
1635
1777
4900
747
1124
1339
1496
1646
1789
4950
752
1131
1348
1506
1656
1800
5000
755
1136
1353
1511
1662
1807
5050
759
1141
1358
1516
1668
1813
5100
762
1145
1362
1522
1674
1820
5150
766
1150
1367
1527
1680
1826
5200
769
1155
1372
1533
1686
1833
5250
773
1159
1377
1538
1692
1839
5300
776
1164
1382
1544
1698
1846
5350
780
1169
1387
1549
1704
1852
5400
783
1173
1392
1554
1710
1859
5450
787
1178
1397
1560
1716
1865
5500
790
1183
1401
1565
1722
1872
5550
794
1187
1406
1571
1728
1878
5600
797
1192
1411
1576
1734
1885
5650
800
1196
1416
1582
1740
1891
5700
803
1201
1421
1587
1746
1897
5750
806
1205
1425
1592
1751
1904
5800
809
1209
1430
1598
1757
1910
5850
812
1213
1435
1603
1763
1917
5900
815
1217
1440
1608
1769
1923
5950
818
1221
1444
1613
1775
1929
6000
821
1226
1449
1619
1781
1936
6050
823
1230
1454
1624
1787
1942
6100
826
1234
1459
1629
1792
1948
6150
829
1238
1464
1635
1798
1955
6200
832
1242
1468
1640
1804
1961
6250
835
1246
1473
1645
1810
1967
6300
838
1251
1478
1651
1816
1974
6350
841
1255
1483
1656
1822
1980
6400
844
1259
1487
1661
1827
1986
6450
847
1263
1492
1667
1833
1993
6500
849
1267
1497
1672
1839
1999
6550
852
1271
1502
1677
1845
2005
6600
855
1276
1506
1683
1851
2012
6650
858
1280
1511
1688
1857
2018
6700
861
1285
1517
1694
1864
2026
6750
865
1291
1524
1703
1873
2036
6800
869
1297
1532
1711
1882
2046
6850
873
1303
1539
1719
1891
2056
6900
877
1309
1547
1728
1900
2066
6950
881
1315
1554
1736
1909
2076
7000
885
1321
1561
1744
1919
2085
7050
889
1328
1569
1752
1928
2095
7100
893
1334
1576
1761
1937
2105
7150
897
1340
1584
1769
1946
2115
7200
901
1346
1591
1777
1955
2125
7250
905
1352
1599
1786
1964
2135
7300
909
1358
1606
1794
1973
2145
7350
913
1364
1613
1802
1982
2155
7400
917
1370
1621
1810
1991
2165
7450
921
1376
1628
1819
2001
2175
7500
925
1382
1636
1827
2010
2185
7550
929
1389
1643
1835
2019
2194
7600
933
1395
1650
1844
2028
2204
7650
937
1401
1658
1852
2037
2214
7700
941
1407
1665
1860
2046
2224
7750
944
1411
1670
1865
2051
2230
7800
946
1413
1672
1867
2054
2233
7850
948
1416
1674
1870
2057
2236
7900
950
1419
1676
1873
2060
2239
7950
953
1421
1679
1875
2063
2242
8000
955
1424
1681
1878
2065
2245
8050
957
1426
1683
1880
2068
2248
8100
959
1429
1685
1883
2071
2251
8150
961
1432
1688
1885
2074
2254
8200
963
1434
1690
1888
2076
2257
8250
965
1436
1692
1890
2079
2260
8300
967
1439
1694
1892
2082
2263
8350
969
1441
1696
1895
2084
2266
8400
971
1444
1699
1897
2087
2269
8450
973
1446
1701
1899
2089
2271
8500
974
1447
1702
1901
2091
2273
8550
975
1449
1704
1903
2093
2276
8600
976
1450
1705
1905
2096
2278
8650
977
1452
1707
1907
2098
2280
8700
978
1453
1709
1909
2100
2282
8750
979
1455
1710
1911
2102
2284
8800
980
1456
1712
1912
2104
2287
8850
981
1457
1714
1914
2106
2289
8900
982
1459
1715
1916
2108
2291
8950
983
1460
1717
1918
2110
2293
9000
984
1462
1719
1920
2112
2295
9050
985
1463
1720
1922
2114
2298
9100
986
1465
1722
1923
2116
2300
9150
987
1466
1724
1925
2118
2302
9200
991
1471
1730
1932
2125
2310
9250
994
1477
1737
1940
2134
2319
9300
998
1483
1743
1947
2142
2328
9350
1002
1488
1750
1955
2150
2337
9400
1005
1494
1757
1962
2159
2346
9450
1009
1499
1764
1970
2167
2355
9500
1013
1505
1771
1978
2176
2365
9550
1017
1511
1778
1986
2185
2375
9600
1021
1518
1786
1995
2194
2385
9650
1025
1524
1793
2003
2203
2395
9700
1029
1530
1801
2011
2212
2405
9750
1033
1536
1808
2020
2222
2415
9800
1037
1543
1816
2028
2231
2425
9850
1041
1549
1823
2036
2240
2435
9900
1046
1555
1831
2045
2249
2445
9950
1050
1561
1838
2053
2258
2455
10000
1054
1567
1845
2061
2268
2465
10050
1058
1574
1853
2070
2277
2475
10100
1062
1580
1860
2078
2286
2485
10150
1066
1586
1868
2086
2295
2495
10200
1070
1592
1875
2095
2304
2505
10250
1074
1599
1883
2103
2314
2515
10300
1079
1605
1891
2112
2323
2525
10350
1083
1611
1898
2121
2333
2536
10400
1087
1618
1906
2129
2342
2546
10450
1091
1624
1914
2138
2351
2556
10500
1095
1631
1921
2146
2361
2566
10550
1100
1637
1929
2155
2370
2576
10600
1104
1643
1937
2163
2380
2587
10650
1108
1650
1944
2172
2389
2597
10700
1112
1656
1952
2180
2398
2607
10750
1117
1662
1960
2189
2408
2617
10800
1121
1669
1967
2197
2417
2627
10850
1125
1675
1975
2206
2427
2638
10900
1129
1682
1983
2214
2436
2648
10950
1134
1688
1990
2223
2445
2658
11000
1138
1694
1998
2232
2455
2668
11050
1142
1701
2005
2240
2464
2678
11100
1146
1707
2013
2249
2474
2689
11150
1150
1714
2021
2257
2483
2699
11200
1154
1718
2026
2263
2489
2706
11250
1157
1722
2030
2267
2494
2711
11300
1159
1726
2034
2272
2499
2717
11350
1162
1730
2038
2276
2504
2722
11400
1165
1733
2042
2281
2509
2727
11450
1168
1737
2046
2285
2514
2733
11500
1171
1741
2050
2290
2519
2738
11550
1173
1745
2054
2294
2524
2743
11600
1176
1749
2058
2299
2529
2749
11650
1179
1752
2062
2303
2534
2754
11700
1182
1756
2066
2308
2538
2759
11750
1185
1760
2070
2312
2543
2765
11800
1187
1764
2074
2317
2548
2770
11850
1190
1768
2078
2321
2553
2775
11900
1193
1771
2082
2326
2558
2781
11950
1196
1775
2086
2330
2563
2786
12000
1199
1779
2090
2335
2568
2791
12050
1201
1783
2094
2339
2573
2797
12100
1204
1787
2098
2344
2578
2802
12150
1207
1790
2102
2348
2583
2808
12200
1210
1795
2107
2354
2589
2815
12250
1213
1800
2113
2360
2596
2822
12300
1216
1804
2118
2366
2603
2829
12350
1220
1809
2124
2372
2610
2837
12400
1223
1814
2129
2378
2616
2844
12450
1226
1818
2135
2384
2623
2851
12500
1229
1823
2140
2391
2630
2858
12550
1232
1828
2146
2397
2636
2866
12600
1235
1832
2151
2403
2643
2873
12650
1239
1837
2157
2409
2650
2880
12700
1242
1842
2162
2415
2657
2888
12750
1245
1846
2168
2421
2663
2895
12800
1248
1851
2173
2427
2670
2902
12850
1251
1856
2178
2433
2677
2910
12900
1254
1860
2184
2439
2683
2917
12950
1257
1865
2189
2446
2690
2924
13000
1261
1870
2195
2452
2697
2931
13050
1264
1874
2200
2458
2704
2939
13100
1267
1879
2206
2464
2710
2946
13150
1270
1884
2211
2470
2717
2953
13200
1273
1888
2217
2476
2724
2961
13250
1276
1893
2222
2482
2730
2968
13300
1279
1898
2228
2488
2737
2975
13350
1283
1902
2233
2494
2744
2983
13400
1286
1907
2239
2501
2751
2990
13450
1289
1912
2244
2507
2757
2997
13500
1292
1916
2250
2513
2764
3005
13550
1295
1921
2256
2520
2772
3013
13600
1297
1925
2262
2526
2779
3021
13650
1300
1930
2268
2533
2786
3029
13700
1303
1935
2274
2540
2794
3037
13750
1306
1939
2280
2546
2801
3045
13800
1308
1944
2286
2553
2808
3053
13850
1311
1948
2292
2560
2816
3061
13900
1314
1953
2298
2566
2823
3069
13950
1317
1957
2304
2573
2830
3077
14000
1320
1962
2310
2580
2838
3085
14050
1322
1967
2316
2586
2845
3093
14100
1325
1971
2322
2593
2852
3101
14150
1328
1976
2328
2600
2860
3109
14200
1331
1980
2333
2607
2867
3117
14250
1334
1985
2339
2613
2875
3125
14300
1336
1990
2345
2620
2882
3133
14350
1339
1994
2351
2627
2889
3141
14400
1342
1999
2357
2633
2897
3149
14450
1345
2003
2363
2640
2904
3157
14500
1347
2008
2369
2647
2911
3164
14550
1350
2013
2375
2653
2919
3172
14600
1353
2017
2381
2660
2926
3180
14650
1356
2022
2387
2667
2933
3188
14700
1359
2026
2393
2673
2941
3196
14750
1361
2031
2399
2680
2948
3204
14800
1364
2036
2405
2686
2955
3212
14850
1368
2040
2410
2692
2961
3219
14900
1371
2045
2415
2698
2967
3226
14950
1375
2050
2420
2703
2974
3232
15000
1378
2055
2425
2709
2980
3239
15050
1382
2059
2430
2714
2986
3246
15100
1385
2064
2435
2720
2992
3252
15150
1389
2069
2440
2726
2998
3259
15200
1392
2074
2445
2731
3004
3266
15250
1396
2078
2450
2737
3010
3272
15300
1400
2083
2455
2742
3017
3279
15350
1403
2088
2460
2748
3023
3286
15400
1407
2093
2465
2754
3029
3292
15450
1410
2098
2470
2759
3035
3299
15500
1414
2102
2475
2765
3041
3306
15550
1417
2107
2480
2770
3047
3312
15600
1421
2112
2485
2776
3053
3319
15650
1424
2117
2490
2781
3060
3326
15700
1428
2121
2495
2787
3066
3333
15750
1431
2126
2500
2793
3072
3339
15800
1435
2131
2505
2798
3078
3346
15850
1438
2136
2510
2804
3084
3353
15900
1442
2140
2515
2809
3090
3359
15950
1445
2145
2520
2815
3097
3366
16000
1449
2150
2525
2821
3103
3373
16050
1453
2155
2530
2826
3109
3379
16100
1456
2159
2535
2832
3115
3386
16150
1458
2162
2538
2835
3119
3390
16200
1459
2164
2541
2838
3122
3394
16250
1461
2167
2544
2841
3125
3397
16300
1462
2169
2546
2844
3128
3401
16350
1464
2171
2549
2847
3132
3404
16400
1465
2173
2551
2850
3135
3408
16450
1466
2175
2554
2853
3138
3411
16500
1468
2177
2557
2856
3141
3415
16550
1469
2179
2559
2859
3144
3418
16600
1471
2182
2562
2862
3148
3422
16650
1472
2184
2564
2864
3151
3425
16700
1473
2186
2567
2867
3154
3428
16750
1475
2188
2570
2870
3157
3432
16800
1476
2190
2572
2873
3160
3435
16850
1477
2192
2575
2876
3164
3439
16900
1479
2194
2577
2879
3167
3442
16950
1480
2196
2580
2882
3170
3446
17000
1481
2198
2582
2885
3173
3449
17050
1483
2200
2585
2887
3176
3452
17100
1484
2203
2588
2890
3179
3456
17150
1486
2205
2590
2893
3182
3459
17200
1487
2207
2593
2896
3186
3463
17250
1488
2209
2595
2899
3189
3466
17300
1490
2211
2598
2902
3192
3470
17350
1491
2213
2600
2905
3195
3473
17400
1492
2215
2603
2907
3198
3476
17450
1494
2217
2605
2910
3201
3480
17500
1495
2219
2608
2913
3204
3483
17550
1497
2222
2611
2916
3208
3487
17600
1498
2224
2613
2919
3211
3490
17650
1499
2226
2616
2922
3214
3494
17700
1501
2228
2618
2925
3217
3497
17750
1502
2230
2621
2928
3220
3500
17800
1503
2232
2623
2930
3223
3504
17850
1505
2234
2626
2933
3227
3507
17900
1506
2236
2629
2936
3230
3511
17950
1507
2238
2631
2939
3233
3514
18000
1509
2240
2634
2942
3236
3518
18050
1510
2243
2636
2945
3239
3521
18100
1512
2245
2639
2948
3242
3524
18150
1513
2247
2641
2950
3245
3528
18200
1514
2249
2644
2953
3249
3531
18250
1516
2251
2647
2956
3252
3535
18300
1517
2253
2649
2959
3255
3538
18350
1520
2256
2652
2963
3259
3542
18400
1522
2259
2655
2966
3263
3547
18450
1524
2262
2658
2970
3266
3551
18500
1526
2265
2662
2973
3270
3555
18550
1528
2268
2665
2976
3274
3559
18600
1530
2271
2668
2980
3278
3563
18650
1532
2274
2671
2983
3282
3567
18700
1535
2277
2674
2987
3285
3571
18750
1537
2280
2677
2990
3289
3575
18800
1539
2283
2680
2994
3293
3579
18850
1541
2285
2683
2997
3297
3584
18900
1543
2288
2686
3000
3301
3588
18950
1545
2291
2689
3004
3304
3592
19000
1547
2294
2692
3007
3308
3596
19050
1550
2297
2695
3011
3312
3600
19100
1552
2300
2698
3014
3316
3604
19150
1554
2303
2702
3018
3319
3608
19200
1556
2306
2705
3021
3323
3612
19250
1558
2309
2708
3025
3327
3616
19300
1560
2312
2711
3028
3331
3621
19350
1563
2315
2714
3031
3335
3625
19400
1565
2318
2717
3035
3338
3629
19450
1567
2320
2720
3038
3342
3633
19500
1569
2323
2723
3042
3346
3637
19550
1571
2326
2726
3045
3350
3641
19600
1573
2329
2729
3049
3353
3645
19650
1575
2332
2732
3052
3357
3649
19700
1578
2335
2735
3055
3361
3653
19750
1580
2338
2738
3059
3365
3658
19800
1582
2341
2742
3062
3369
3662
19850
1584
2344
2745
3066
3372
3666
19900
1586
2347
2748
3069
3376
3670
19950
1588
2350
2751
3073
3380
3674
20000
1591
2353
2754
3076
3384
3678
20050
1593
2355
2757
3080
3387
3682
20100
1595
2358
2760
3083
3391
3686
20150
1597
2361
2763
3086
3395
3690
20200
1599
2364
2766
3090
3399
3695
20250
1601
2367
2769
3093
3403
3699
20300
1603
2370
2772
3097
3406
3703
20350
1606
2373
2775
3100
3410
3707
20400
1608
2376
2778
3104
3414
3711
20450
1610
2379
2782
3107
3418
3715
20500
1612
2382
2785
3110
3421
3719
20550
1614
2385
2788
3114
3425
3723
20600
1616
2388
2791
3117
3429
3727
20650
1619
2390
2794
3121
3433
3731
20700
1621
2393
2797
3124
3437
3736
20750
1623
2396
2800
3128
3440
3740
20800
1625
2399
2803
3131
3444
3744
20850
1627
2402
2806
3135
3448
3748
20900
1629
2405
2809
3138
3452
3752
20950
1631
2408
2812
3141
3456
3756
21000
1634
2411
2815
3145
3459
3760
21050
1636
2414
2818
3148
3463
3764
21100
1638
2417
2822
3152
3467
3768
21150
1640
2420
2825
3155
3471
3773
21200
1642
2423
2828
3159
3474
3777
21250
1644
2425
2831
3162
3478
3781
21300
1647
2428
2834
3165
3482
3785
21350
1649
2431
2837
3169
3486
3789
21400
1651
2434
2840
3172
3490
3793
21450
1653
2437
2843
3176
3493
3797
21500
1655
2440
2846
3179
3497
3801
21550
1657
2443
2849
3183
3501
3805
21600
1659
2446
2853
3187
3506
3811
21650
1661
2449
2857
3191
3510
3816
21700
1663
2452
2861
3195
3515
3821
21750
1665
2455
2865
3200
3520
3826
21800
1667
2458
2868
3204
3524
3831
21850
1668
2461
2872
3208
3529
3836
21900
1670
2464
2876
3213
3534
3841
21950
1672
2467
2880
3217
3539
3846
22000
1674
2470
2884
3221
3543
3852
22050
1676
2473
2888
3225
3548
3857
22100
1678
2476
2891
3230
3553
3862
22150
1680
2479
2895
3234
3557
3867
22200
1681
2482
2899
3238
3562
3872
22250
1683
2485
2903
3243
3567
3877
22300
1685
2488
2907
3247
3571
3882
22350
1687
2491
2911
3251
3576
3887
22400
1689
2494
2914
3255
3581
3892
22450
1691
2497
2918
3260
3586
3898
22500
1692
2500
2922
3264
3590
3903
22550
1694
2503
2926
3268
3595
3908
22600
1696
2506
2930
3272
3600
3913
22650
1698
2509
2934
3277
3604
3918
22700
1700
2512
2937
3281
3609
3923
22750
1702
2515
2941
3285
3614
3928
22800
1704
2518
2945
3290
3619
3933
22850
1705
2521
2949
3294
3623
3938
22900
1707
2524
2953
3298
3628
3944
22950
1709
2527
2957
3302
3633
3949
23000
1711
2530
2960
3307
3637
3954
23050
1713
2533
2964
3311
3642
3959
23100
1715
2536
2968
3315
3647
3964
23150
1717
2539
2972
3320
3651
3969
23200
1718
2542
2976
3324
3656
3974
23250
1720
2545
2979
3328
3661
3979
23300
1722
2548
2983
3332
3666
3984
23350
1724
2551
2987
3337
3670
3990
23400
1726
2554
2991
3341
3675
3995
23450
1728
2557
2995
3345
3680
4000
23500
1730
2560
2999
3349
3684
4005
23550
1731
2563
3002
3354
3689
4010
23600
1733
2566
3006
3358
3694
4015
23650
1735
2569
3010
3362
3699
4020
23700
1737
2572
3014
3367
3703
4025
23750
1739
2575
3018
3371
3708
4031
23800
1741
2578
3022
3375
3713
4036
23850
1742
2581
3025
3379
3717
4041
23900
1744
2584
3029
3384
3722
4046
23950
1746
2587
3033
3388
3727
4051
24000
1748
2590
3037
3392
3731
4056
24050
1750
2593
3041
3397
3736
4061
24100
1752
2596
3045
3401
3741
4066
24150
1754
2599
3048
3405
3746
4071
24200
1755
2602
3052
3409
3750
4077
24250
1757
2605
3056
3414
3755
4082
24300
1759
2608
3060
3418
3760
4087
24350
1761
2611
3064
3422
3764
4092
24400
1763
2614
3068
3426
3769
4097
24450
1765
2617
3071
3431
3774
4102
24500
1767
2620
3075
3435
3779
4107
24550
1768
2623
3079
3439
3783
4112
24600
1770
2626
3083
3444
3788
4117
24650
1772
2629
3087
3448
3793
4123
24700
1774
2632
3091
3452
3797
4128
24750
1776
2635
3094
3456
3802
4133
24800
1778
2638
3098
3461
3807
4138
24850
1780
2641
3102
3465
3811
4143
24900
1781
2644
3106
3469
3816
4148
24950
1783
2647
3110
3474
3821
4153
25000
1785
2650
3114
3478
3826
4158
25050
1787
2653
3117
3482
3830
4163
25100
1789
2656
3121
3486
3835
4169
25150
1791
2659
3125
3491
3840
4174
25200
1792
2662
3129
3495
3844
4179
25250
1794
2665
3133
3499
3849
4184
25300
1796
2668
3136
3503
3854
4189
25350
1798
2671
3140
3508
3858
4194
25400
1800
2674
3144
3512
3863
4199
25450
1802
2677
3148
3516
3868
4204
25500
1804
2680
3152
3521
3873
4210
25550
1805
2682
3156
3525
3877
4215
25600
1807
2685
3159
3529
3882
4220
25650
1809
2688
3163
3533
3887
4225
25700
1811
2691
3167
3538
3891
4230
25750
1813
2694
3171
3542
3896
4235
25800
1815
2697
3175
3546
3901
4240
25850
1817
2700
3179
3550
3906
4245
25900
1818
2703
3182
3555
3910
4250
25950
1820
2706
3186
3559
3915
4256
26000
1822
2709
3190
3563
3920
4261
26050
1824
2712
3194
3568
3924
4266
26100
1826
2715
3198
3572
3929
4271
26150
1828
2718
3202
3576
3934
4276
26200
1830
2721
3205
3580
3938
4281
26250
1831
2724
3209
3585
3943
4286
26300
1833
2727
3213
3589
3948
4291
26350
1835
2730
3217
3593
3953
4296
26400
1837
2733
3221
3598
3957
4302
26450
1839
2736
3225
3602
3962
4307
26500
1841
2739
3228
3606
3967
4312
26550
1842
2742
3232
3610
3971
4317
26600
1844
2745
3236
3615
3976
4322
26650
1846
2748
3240
3619
3981
4327
26700
1848
2751
3244
3623
3986
4332
26750
1850
2754
3248
3627
3990
4337
26800
1852
2757
3251
3632
3995
4342
26850
1854
2760
3255
3636
4000
4348
26900
1855
2763
3259
3640
4004
4353
26950
1857
2766
3263
3645
4009
4358
27000
1859
2769
3267
3649
4014
4363
27050
1861
2772
3270
3653
4018
4368
27100
1863
2775
3274
3657
4023
4373
27150
1865
2778
3278
3662
4028
4378
27200
1867
2781
3282
3666
4033
4383
27250
1868
2784
3286
3670
4037
4389
27300
1870
2787
3290
3675
4042
4394
27350
1872
2790
3293
3679
4047
4399
27400
1874
2793
3297
3683
4051
4404
27450
1876
2796
3301
3687
4056
4409
27500
1878
2799
3305
3692
4061
4414
27550
1880
2802
3309
3696
4066
4419
27600
1881
2805
3313
3700
4070
4424
27650
1883
2808
3316
3704
4075
4429
27700
1885
2811
3320
3709
4080
4435
27750
1887
2814
3324
3713
4084
4440
27800
1889
2817
3328
3717
4089
4445
27850
1891
2820
3332
3722
4094
4450
27900
1892
2823
3336
3726
4098
4455
27950
1894
2826
3339
3730
4103
4460
28000
1896
2829
3343
3734
4108
4465
28050
1898
2832
3347
3739
4113
4470
28100
1899
2833
3348
3740
4114
4472
28150
1900
2834
3349
3741
4115
4473
28200
1900
2835
3349
3741
4115
4473
28250
1901
2836
3350
3742
4116
4474
28300
1902
2836
3350
3742
4116
4474
28350
1902
2837
3351
3743
4117
4475
28400
1903
2838
3351
3743
4117
4476
28450
1904
2838
3351
3744
4118
4476
28500
1904
2839
3352
3744
4118
4477
28550
1905
2840
3352
3745
4119
4477
28600
1906
2840
3353
3745
4120
4478
28650
1906
2841
3353
3745
4120
4478
28700
1907
2842
3354
3746
4121
4479
28750
1908
2842
3354
3746
4121
4480
28800
1908
2843
3354
3747
4122
4480
28850
1909
2844
3355
3747
4122
4481
28900
1909
2844
3355
3748
4123
4481
28950
1910
2845
3356
3748
4123
4482
29000
1911
2846
3356
3749
4124
4483
29050
1911
2846
3357
3749
4124
4483
29100
1912
2847
3357
3750
4125
4484
29150
1913
2848
3358
3750
4125
4484
29200
1913
2848
3358
3751
4126
4485
29250
1914
2849
3358
3751
4126
4485
29300
1915
2850
3359
3752
4127
4486
29350
1915
2850
3359
3752
4128
4487
29400
1916
2851
3360
3753
4128
4487
29450
1917
2852
3360
3753
4129
4488
29500
1917
2852
3361
3754
4129
4488
29550
1918
2853
3361
3754
4130
4489
29600
1919
2854
3361
3755
4130
4490
29650
1919
2855
3362
3755
4131
4490
29700
1920
2855
3362
3756
4131
4491
29750
1921
2856
3363
3756
4132
4491
29800
1921
2857
3363
3757
4132
4492
29850
1922
2857
3364
3757
4133
4492
29900
1923
2858
3364
3758
4133
4493
29950
1923
2859
3365
3758
4134
4494
30000
1924
2859
3365
3759
4135
4494
30050
1925
2860
3365
3759
4135
4495
30100
1925
2861
3366
3760
4136
4495
30150
1926
2861
3366
3760
4136
4496
30200
1926
2862
3367
3761
4137
4497
30250
1927
2863
3367
3761
4137
4497
30300
1928
2863
3368
3762
4138
4498
30350
1928
2864
3368
3762
4138
4498
30400
1929
2865
3368
3763
4139
4499
30450
1930
2865
3369
3763
4139
4499
30500
1930
2866
3369
3764
4140
4500
30550
1931
2867
3370
3764
4140